Oklahoma, session 2025, HJR1016.
Be it Enacted By the People
of the State of Oklahoma."
Petitions and orders for the initiative and for the referendum
shall be filed with the Secretary of State and addressed to the
Governor of the state, who shall submit the same to the people. The
Legislature shall make suitable provisions for carrying into effect
the provisions of this article.
SECTION 2. The Ballot Title for the proposed Constitutional
amendment as set forth in SECTION 1 of this resolution shall be in
the following form:
BALLOT TITLE
Legislative Referendum No. ____ State Question No. ____
THE GIST OF THE PROPOSITION IS AS FOLLOWS:
This measure amends the Oklahoma Constitution. It amends
Section 3 of Article 5. This section currently allows the
Legislature or Governor to set a special election date for
measures that are proposed by the people for a statewide vote.
This measure would remove the Legislature's and Governor's
ability to set those special election dates. All measures
Req. No. 10732 Page 2

proposed by the people would then appear on the next general
election ballot.
SHALL THE PROPOSAL BE APPROVED?
FOR THE PROPOSAL — YES _____________
AGAINST THE PROPOSAL — NO _____________
SECTION 3. The Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives,
immediately after the passage of this resolution, shall prepare and
file one copy thereof, including the Ballot Title set forth in
SECTION 2 hereof, with the Secretary of State and one copy with the
Attorney General.

60-1-10732 MJ 01/15/25












Req. No. 10732 Page 3